Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORLD JUNIOR HOCKEY CHAMPIONSHIPS.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the director of Explore Minnesota for a grant to Minnesota Sports and Events for costs related to the World Junior Hockey Championships, which will occur in Minnesota in December of 2025 and January of 2026. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end